Tennessee, session 114, SB1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-701, is amended by adding the
following language as a new subsection:
(n) Notwithstanding this section, a taxpayer who is eighty-five (85) years of age
or older and who has received property tax relief pursuant to § 67-5-702 for at least five
(5) consecutive years is not required to submit a complete application or report income
for continued participation; provided, that the taxpayer's annual income does not exceed
the annually adjusted income threshold described in § 67-5-702(a)(2), and the taxpayer
meets all other non-income-related criteria for eligibility. The state board of equalization,
division of property assessments, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury and
county property assessors, shall develop a simplified reapplication process for taxpayers
described in this subsection (n) that may be completed online or via mail that allows the
taxpayer to indicate whether the taxpayer meets the income and non-income-related
requirements by checking a box or boxes.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1326
002422
- 1 -